Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.35.770

Refunding bonds.

Each board of trustees is hereby empowered to issue refunding bonds to provide funds to refund any or all outstanding bonds payable from the bond retirement fund and to pay any redemption premium payable on such outstanding bonds being refunded. Such refunding bonds may be issued in the manner and on terms and conditions and with the covenants permitted by RCW 28B.35.700 through 28B.35.790 as now or hereafter amended for the issuance of bonds. The refunding bonds shall be payable out of the bond retirement fund and shall not constitute an obligation either general or special, of the state or a general obligation of the college or university of Washington issuing the bonds or the board thereof. The board may exchange the refunding bonds at par for the bonds which are being refunded or may sell them in such manner, at such price and at such rate or rates of interest as it deems for the best interest of the college or university.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 89; 1970 ex.s. c 56 s 31; 1969 ex.s. c 232 s 105; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.40.770. Prior: 1961 ex.s. c 14 s 8. Formerly RCW 28B.40.770; 28.81.570.]

NOTES:

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.

Purpose—1970 ex.s. c 56: See note following RCW 39.52.020.

Validation—Saving—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 232: See notes following RCW 39.52.020.